Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7573.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 24-8 of the General Laws entitled "Construction and Maintenance of
State Roads" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
24-8-46. Municipal work and reimbursement on certain state highways.
(a) A municipality and the Rhode Island department of transportation (the “department”)
shall have the power to enter into a contract (“contract”) for the municipality to perform minor and
routine maintenance work ("project work") on the roadway and shoulders of any state highway
located within the municipal boundaries of the municipality.
(b) Each municipality which completes the project work described in subsection (a) of this
section pursuant to a contract authorized by this section, shall be relieved from any tort liability
arising after completion of such work, if the completed project work conforms to the standards of
the contract as agreed to by the department.
(c) Each municipality shall be entitled to receive payment or reimbursement from the
department, in accordance with the contract, if the completed project work conforms to the
standards of the contract as agreed to by the department.
(d) Nothing contained in this section shall impar, suspend, contract, enlarge, extend, or
affect in any manner the powers and duties of the department including, but not limited to, those
contained in the provisions of chapter 13 of title 42 (“department of transportation”).

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004697
========
LC004697 - Page 2 of 3